Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1204.01
Training services; priority to community college areas.

Whenever practicable, the Department of Economic Development shall give priority consideration to training services offered by community college areas.

Laws 2008, LB956, § 3.